src/morphology/affixes/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON COASKKITCnj
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/goahti+V:»išgoah'ti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>a K ;
!+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%> K ; !SUB Poetic form
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>ij K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%> K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3:%>ivčči%>i K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:%>ivčču%>i K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>ivčče%> K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:%>ivččo%> K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:%>eažžá%> K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:%>eaš K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3:%>eš K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:%>eačča%> K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:%>eaš K ;	
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>eš K ;	
 +V+IV+Imprt+Sg3:%>ehko%>s ENDLEX ;
 +V+IV+Inf:%>it K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»eapmi%> K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»eami%> K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:»eami%> R ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»eame%> R ;
! +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc+Use/NG:»eame%> K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»eami%> K ;
! +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»eame%> K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen+Allegro+Use/NG:eapmi%>X8 K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»an R ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»eapmá%>i K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:eapmi%>n K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:»eami%>s K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»eame%>s K ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»emi%>jn K ;
! +V+IV+Actio+Nom:%>eapmi%> K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Nom:%>an K ; ! ! shortened (reintro)
 +V+IV+Actio+Gen:%>an K ; ! ! shortened (reintro)
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess:%>eame%> K ;
! +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Err/Orth:%>eami%> K ; ! -eami not Actio Ess
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Err/Orth:%>eami%>n K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess:%>eame%>n K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Loc:%>eame%>s K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Loc:%>eami%>s K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Com:%>emi%>jn K ;
 +V+IV+Ger:%>ettiin K ;
 +V+IV+Ger:%>ettiin%> PxC ;
 +V+IV+PrfPrc:%>an K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>an K ;
 +V+IV+VAbess:%>#keahttá K ;
 +V+IV+VAbess+Err/Orth:%>#keahtá K ;
 +V+IV+VAbess+Err/Orth:%>#keahttái K ;
 +V+IV+VAbess+Use/NG:%>#keahttájin K ;
 +V+IV+A+Attr:%>#keahtes K ;
 +V+IV+A+Attr+Err/Orth:%>#keahttes K ;
 +V+IV+VAbess+Use/NG:%>#haga K ;
! +V+IV+A+Attr+Err/Orth:%>#ha K ;
 +V+IV+Sup:%>eažžat K ; ! Rare form !!


LEXICON ARVVASJ_IV   !!= * __@CODE@__ Words ending -šit, -skit, smit, -idit, -ldit, -git and 5-syllables
 COASKKITCnj ;

LEXICON ARVIL_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit with Personal Passive
 COASKKITCnj ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsARVIL ;


LEXICON MUITAL_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsMUITAL ;

LEXICON OAHPAHIT_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> OAHPAHITStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsMUITAL ;


LEXICON MUITTASJ_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Words ending -šit, -skit, -ldit - no actiocmp
 +V+TV:%> MUITTASJStem ;
!directed here as well:
!Reciprocals on -dit
!Momentatives on -dit, -ádit, -ihit, -e7hit
!Frequentatives on -(u)hit
!Continuatives on -nit
!Inchoatives in -nit

LEXICON HALIID_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Words ending -smit, -idit, -git - no actiocmp
 +V+TV:%> MUITTASJStem ;
 +V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON BONJAT_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ !Cont/Freq on -dit, Continuatives on -(u)hit, Reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit - actio componds
 +V+TV:%> MUITALStem ;

LEXICON VUORDIL_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit, -rit with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> MUITALStem ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsVUORDIL ;

LEXICON MUITALStem
 PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»supmái K ;  !not for unevenstems
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsCTV ;

LEXICON OAHPAHITStem
 PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»supmái K ;  !not for unevenstems
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsMUITALTV ;
  +Der2+Der/NomAg:»eaddji¤» ACTORSHORTTVder ; ! no compound


LEXICON MUITTASJStem
 PASSIVE ;
! +Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-Spell:»supmái K ; !not for unevenstems
 MUITALINCH ;
 DeverbalNounsMUITTASJTV ;


LEXICON MUITALINCH
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:»išgoah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ;
 MUITALCnj ;

LEXICON MUITALCnj  !!= * __@CODE@__ Substems for Consonantal Verb Stems
 +Ind+Prs: PrsC ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtC ;
 +Cond+Prs:ivčče%> CondC ;
 +Cond+Prs+Err/Orth:ivččo%> CondC ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:eš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:eačča%> K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:eš K ;
! +Pot+Prs:eažža%> PrsV ; !replaced by individual pointers, because of ped. proj
 +Pot+Prs:eačča PrsV1 ; !1,2
 +Pot+Prs+Use/NG:eažžá PrsV2 ; !  !3
 +Pot+Prs:ežže PrsV3 ;
! +Pot+Prs:Q6 PrsV4 ;
 +Pot+Prs:eažža PrsV5 ;
 +Imprt: ImprtSg2 ;
 ImprtC ;
 NominalFormsC ;

LEXICON HURAIINCH
 +Der4+Der/goahti+V:d%>»išgoah'ti%> BOAHTICnj ;
 HURAICnj ;

LEXICON HURAICnj  !!= * __@CODE@__ Substems for Consonantal Verb Stems
 +Ind+Prs:d%> PrsC ;
 +Ind+Prt:d%> PrtC ;
 +Cond+Prs:d%>ivčče%> CondC ;
 +Cond+Prs+Err/Orth:d%>ivččo%> CondC ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:d%>eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+Sg3:d%>eš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:d%>eaš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg:d%>eš K ;
 +Pot+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:d%>eačča%> K ;
! +Pot+Prs:d%>eažža%> PrsV ; !replaced by individual pointers, because of ped. proj
 +Pot+Prs:d%>eačča PrsV1 ; !1,2
 +Pot+Prs+Use/NG:d%>eažžá PrsV2 ; !  !3
 +Pot+Prs:d%>ežže PrsV3 ;
! +Pot+Prs:d%>Q6 PrsV4 ;
 +Pot+Prs:d%>eažža PrsV5 ;
 +Imprt:d%> ImprtSg2 ;
 :d%> ImprtC ;
 +Inf:d%>it K ;
 +Sup:d%>eažžat K ; ! Rare form !!
! +Actio+Nom:d%>eapmi%> K ;
! +Actio+Nom+Err/Orth:d%>eapme%> K ;
 +Actio+Gen:d%>an K ; ! shortened (reintro?)
 +Actio+Nom:d%>an K ; ! shortened (reintro?)
 +Actio+Ess:d%>eame%> K ;
! +Actio+Ess+Err/Orth:d%>eami%> K ; ! -eami is not Actio Ess
 +Actio+Ess+Err/Orth:d%>eami%>n K ;
 +Actio+Ess+Dial/%-GG:d%>eame%>n K ;
 +Actio+Loc:d%>eame%>s K ;
 +Actio+Loc:d%>eami%>s K ;
 +Actio+Com:d%>emi%>jn K ;
 +Ger:d%>ettiin K ;
 +Ger:d%>ettiin%> PxC ;
 +PrfPrc:d%>an K ;
 +Ind+Prt+ConNeg:d%>an K ;
 +VAbess:d%>#keahttá K ;
 +VAbess+Err/Orth:d%>#keahtá K ;
 +VAbess+Err/Orth:d%>#keahttái K ;
 +VAbess+Use/NG:d%>#keahttájin K ;
 +VAbess+A+Attr:d%>#keahtes K ; !XXX Why # here? because of final-cons, (TO)
 +VAbess+A+Attr+Err/Orth:d%>#keahttes K ; 
! +VAbess+A+Attr+Err/Orth:d%>#ha K ;
 +VAbess+Use/NG:d%>#haga K ;
 +VGen:%> K ;
! +PrsPrc+Use/-Spell:d%>eaddji@C.NeedNoun@ K ; !L2
! +Use/-Spell: PRSPRCTOADJ ; !L2


LEXICON CondC
 +ConNeg: K ;
 PrtV ;


LEXICON ALIST_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsALIST ;

LEXICON NUOSKIT_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> NUOSKITStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsALIST ;


LEXICON BEAGASJ_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Words ending -šit, -skit -ldit,transitives on -hit - no actiocmp
 +V+IV:%> BEAGASJStem ;
!directed here as well:
!Reciprocals on -dit
!Momentatives on -dit, -ádit, -ihit, -e7hit
!Frequentatives on -(u)hit
!Continuatives on -nit
!Inchoatives in -nit

LEXICON JORGGIID_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Words ending -smit, -idit, -git - no actiocmp
 +V+IV:%> BEAGASJStem ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/ahtti+V:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;

LEXICON HURAI_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Words ending -aidit no actiocmp
 +V+IV: HURAIStem ;
 +V+IV+Der2+Der/ahtti+V:d»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;


LEXICON BALAT_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ !Cont/Freq on -dit, Continuatives on -(u)hit, Reciprocals, momentatives and frequentatives ending -alit - actio compounds
 +V+IV:%> ALISTStem ;

LEXICON SUOTNJAL_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs ending -lit, -rit without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> ALISTStem ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsSUOTNJAL ;

LEXICON BOTNJAS_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs ending -sit without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> MUITALINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsBOTNJAS ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalNounsC ;

LEXICON LASSAN_IV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs ending -nit without Personal Passive IV
 +V+IV:%> MUITALINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsLASSAN ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalNounsC ;


LEXICON LAHKAN_TV  !!= * __@CODE@__ Trisyllabic Verbs ending -nit without Personal Passive TV
 +V+TV:%> MUITALINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsLASSAN ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalNounsC ;
