src/morphology/stems/verbs-L2.lexc
LEXICON Verb
almmáskit:almmásk ARVVASJ_IV ;
arvilit:arvil ARVIL_IV ;
arvvašit:arvvaš ARVVASJ_IV ;
arvváskit:arvvásk ARVVASJ_IV ;
bieggalit:bieggal ARVIL_IV ;
boalggahit:boalggah MUITAL_TV ;
bohtanit:bohtan LASSAN_IV ;
boktalit:boktal VUORDIL_TV ;
bosádit:bosád MUITTASJ_TV ;
buiccuhit:bujccuh BALAT_IV ;
bulljasit:bulljas BOTNJAS_IV ;
bulčulit:bulčul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
buohtastahttalit:buohtastahttal BONJAT_TV ;
báhčilit:báhčil VUORDIL_TV ;
bálgalit:bálgal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
bázestit:báze7st ALIST_IV ;
ceakkastit:ceakkast MUITAL_TV ;
cihraidit:cihraj HURAI_IV ;
cirggehit:cirgge7h BEAGASJ_IV ;
civnniidit:civnnijd JORGGIID_IV ;
daguhit:daguh MUITTASJ_TV ;
dahppasit:dahppas BOTNJAS_IV ;
deaddilit+Err/Sub:deadde7l VUORDIL_TV ; !
deaivvadit:deajvvad BALAT_IV ;
deaškalit:deaškal BONJAT_TV ;
deaškanit:deaškan LASSAN_IV ;
diraidit:diraj HURAI_IV ;
dolkalit:dolkal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
dovddiidit:dovddijd HALIID_TV ;
dulvváskit:dulvvásk ARVVASJ_IV ;
duoggudit:duoggud MUITAL_TV ;
duolbmalit:duolbmal VUORDIL_TV ;
duolvvašit:duolvvaš MUITTASJ_TV ;
dutkkadit:dutkkad BONJAT_TV ;
dádjadit:dádjad ALIST_IV ;
dálkkáskit:dálkkásk ARVVASJ_IV ;
fatnasit:fatnas BOTNJAS_IV ;
fávlánit:fávlán LASSAN_IV ;
garcestit:garcest MUITAL_TV ;
gargguhit:gargguh MUITTASJ_TV ;
gassalit:gas'sal BONJAT_TV ;
geahččalit:geahččal VUORDIL_TV ;
giessasit:giessas BOTNJAS_IV ;
giistalit:giistal SUOTNJAL_IV ; !Turi, muitalus...
ginccihit:ginccih BEAGASJ_IV ;
giđđudit:giđđud ALIST_IV ;
goarvvagit:goarvvag JORGGIID_IV ;
golggadit:golggad BALAT_IV ;
gomaidit:gomaj HURAI_IV ;
govdodit:govdod MUITAL_TV ;
guhkášit:guhkáš MUITTASJ_TV ;
guhpanit:guhpan LASSAN_IV ;
guosadit:guosad BONJAT_TV ;
gáskkiidit:gáskkijd HALIID_TV ;
gávzzagit:gávzzag JORGGIID_IV ;
gášvalit:gášval VUORDIL_TV ;
heairrehit:heajrre7h ALIST_IV ;
hedjonit:hedjon LASSAN_IV ;
hoagahit:hoagah MUITAL_TV ;
holvvádit:holvvád BEAGASJ_IV ;
huoikkádit:huojkkád MUITTASJ_TV ;
háliidit:hálijd HALIID_TV ;
hávddodit:hávddod BONJAT_TV ;
jalaidit:jalaj HURAI_IV ;
jorralit:jorral SUOTNJAL_IV ;
juorrudit:juorrud ALIST_IV ;
labbanit:labban LASSAN_IV ;
ladnjedit:ladnjed BALAT_IV ;
lahkanit:lahkan LAHKAN_TV ;
lahkonit:lahkon LAHKAN_TV ;
lahpasit:lahpas BOTNJAS_IV ;
leaissagit:leaissag JORGGIID_IV ;
libaidit:libaj HURAI_IV ;
liškkihit:liškkih BEAGASJ_IV ;
loaktilit:loaktil VUORDIL_TV ;
luoitalit:luojtal BONJAT_TV ;
meafardit:meafard ALIST_IV ;
merkehit:merkeh MUITAL_TV ;
mollanit:mollan LASSAN_IV ;
moriidit:morijd JORGGIID_IV ;
muohtašit:muohtaš ARVVASJ_IV ;
narggašit:narggaš MUITTASJ_TV ;
njahpasit:njahpas BOTNJAS_IV ;
njalssuhit:njalssuh BALAT_IV ;
njaŋgalit:njaŋgal BONJAT_TV ;
njigaidit:njigaj HURAI_IV ;
njoalpalit:njoalpal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
njoavggistit:njoavggist ALIST_IV ;
njuorššagit:njuorššag JORGGIID_IV ;
noskkihit:noskkih BEAGASJ_IV ;
nuktalit:nuktal VUORDIL_TV ;
nullosit:nullos BOTNJAS_IV ;
nuoskidit:nuoskid NUOSKIT_IV ;
oahpahit:oahpah OAHPAHIT_TV ;
raŋistit:raŋist MUITAL_TV ;
reakčanit:reakčan LASSAN_IV ;
rimssodit:rimssod BALAT_IV ;
rohtiidit:rohtijd HALIID_TV ;
ruibbagit:rujbbag JORGGIID_IV ;
ruodjadit:ruodjad ALIST_IV ;
rusádit:rusád MUITTASJ_TV ;
rámiidit:rámijd HALIID_TV ;
samaidit:samaj HURAI_IV ;
skielgahit:skielgah BEAGASJ_IV ;
skolppagit:skolppag JORGGIID_IV ;
skuolaidit:skuolaj HURAI_IV ;
smorodit:smorod BONJAT_TV ;
soatkasit:soatkas BOTNJAS_IV ;
solžidit:solžid ALIST_IV ;
spierggadit:spierggad BALAT_IV ;
stuimmáskit:stujmmásk BEAGASJ_IV ;
suolbmudit:suolbmud MUITAL_TV ;
sustilit:sustil VUORDIL_TV ;
sággalit:sággal SUOTNJAL_IV ;
sámildit:sámild MUITTASJ_TV ;
vihttánit:vihttán LASSAN_IV ;
vuoččistit:vuoččist ALIST_IV ;
ásaidit:ásaj HURAI_IV ;
časkásit:časkás BOTNJAS_IV ;
čeahkarit:čeahkar SUOTNJAL_IV ;
šealgguhit:šealgguh BALAT_IV ;
šealmmastit:šealmmast MUITAL_TV ;
čeasihit:čeasih BEAGASJ_IV ;
čieskkadit:čieskkad BONJAT_TV ;
širaidit:širaj HURAI_IV ;
šloahkuhit:šloahkuh MUITTASJ_TV ;
šnjalččagit:šnjalččag JORGGIID_IV ;
čoaggilit:čoaggil VUORDIL_TV ;
čuojadit:čuojad BALAT_IV ;
čábbulit:čábbul SUOTNJAL_IV ;
šárihit:šárih BEAGASJ_IV ;
čáđggašit:čáđggaš ARVVASJ_IV ;
